Hawaii statutes.
[§190D-35] Civil liability. Any person
who wilfully or recklessly damages, disturbs, or interferes with any
mariculture or OTEC activity which has been approved by the board, or who
wilfully or recklessly damages, disturbs, interferes with, takes, or possesses
any improvements, assets, marine plants or animals, or equipment in an area
leased to a person, without the permission of that person, shall be subject to
civil proceedings initiated by any person damaged thereby, notwithstanding the
result in any criminal proceedings commenced under section 190D-36. [L 1986, c
91, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next